Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 11
GEORGIA YOUTH CONSERVATION CORPS

Sec.

12-11-1. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Youth Conservation Corps Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-11-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 922, § 1.)

12-11-2. Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares that:

A central element in the development of the state's young persons is the provision of meaningful work experience to teach the value of labor and membership in a productive society;

There is a need for a comprehensive youth development program including meaningful work experience and basic education to address unemployment, undereducation, and lack of life-coping skills among young adults;

This state has a continuing need for involvement by young persons in public works and services, especially relating to conservation, the enhancement of our natural resources, and the provision of human services;

The state is still benefiting from the wide range of public works accomplished by the conservation corps many years ago and that a similar program will likewise benefit future generations; and

Values of hard work, public spiritedness, group achievement and cooperation, resource conservation, and environmental appreciation can and should be transmitted to society's youth through a conservation corps program.

(Code 1981, §

12-11-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 922, § 1.)

12-11-3. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of natural resources.

"Corps" means the Georgia Youth Conservation Corps.

"Council" means the Conservation Corps Advisory Council.

"Director" means the director of the Georgia Youth Conservation Corps.

(Code 1981, §

12-11-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 922, § 1.)

12-11-4. Corps created; purposes; rules and regulations.

There is created within the department the Georgia Youth Conservation Corps.

The purposes and objectives of the corps authorized by this chapter shall be to:

Encourage and develop work skills, discipline, cooperation, and educational opportunities for corps members;

Conserve, rehabilitate, and enhance the state's natural, historic, environmental, and recreational resources;

Develop the state's youth resources through meaningful work experiences and training;

Make outdoor and historic resources of the state available for public enjoyment;

Assist agencies of the state and its political subdivisions in carrying out statutory assignments with limited funding resources;

Provide needed public services in both urban and rural settings;

Protect air, fish, forest, land, water, and wildlife;

Help maintain and improve botanical gardens, historic sites, libraries, museums, parks, parkways, refuges, trails, zoos, and other recreational investments;

(8.1) Assist in residential home improvement weatherization projects having the purpose of reducing energy consumption for home heating and cooling, to the extent authorized by subsection (a.1) of Code Section 12-11-8;

Aid agricultural, fishing, forestry, and tourist industries;

Provide job training for young men and women to act as a stepladder to permanent employment;

Help eradicate fire ants; and

Cooperate specifically with state conservation agencies, the United States Forest Service and the Soil Conservation Service of the federal Department of Agriculture, and with the National Park Service and the Fish and Wildlife Service of the federal Department of Interior.

The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter for the implementation and operation of the corps program.

(Code 1981, §

12-11-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 922, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 321, § 1/HB 493; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 12/HB 142.)

12-11-5. Director; administration of corps programs; energy savings initiatives.

There is created the position of director of the Georgia Youth Conservation Corps. The director shall be appointed by the commissioner and shall be in the unclassified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2.

The commissioner shall be charged with the overall administration of corps programs under the provisions of this chapter and such rules and regulations as are adopted by the board. The commissioner may delegate to the director any or all of the duties and functions prescribed by this chapter. Such duties and functions may include, but are not limited to, the following:

Recruiting and employing staff and corps member leaders and specialists;

Adopting criteria for the selection of applicants to the corps;

Executing agreements for furnishing the services of the corps to any federal, state, or local agency or to any local organization concerned with the overall objectives of the corps and all other agreements necessary and proper for the implementation and administration of this chapter;

Applying for and accepting grants or contributions of funds from any source, public or private;

Providing funds and matching funds to other corps programs meeting the specifications of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board; and

Reporting annually to the council, the Governor, and the General Assembly on the activities undertaken by the corps in the preceding fiscal year, including a cost-effectiveness analysis of all completed, ongoing, and proposed projects.

The commissioner shall have the authority to contract with the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority and the Department of Labor for purposes of management and installation of energy saving material or devices or other projects under this chapter. The commissioner, the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority, and the Department of Labor are encouraged to use the corps for such purposes.

(Code 1981, §

12-11-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 922, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2010, p. 321, § 2/HB 493; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-8/HB 642.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, "the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority" was substituted for "the Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority" in the first and second sentences of subsection (c).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2012, p. 446,

§

3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act." This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446,

§

3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90."

12-11-6. Identification of projects.

The commissioner shall identify conservation, public improvement, or community service projects which will provide long-term benefits to the public, will yield tangible, result oriented works, will provide productive training and work experiences to the corps members involved, will be labor intensive and suitable for a crew of corps members to accomplish, may result in payments to the state for service performed, and can be promptly completed.

(Code 1981, §

12-11-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 922, § 1.)

12-11-7. Enrollment of members; considerations in development of corps program; education component; independent participation by youth served by state agencies.

Corps members shall be residents of the state between 14 and 25 years of age at the time of enrollment who are citizens or lawful permanent residents of the United States. No person shall be enrolled in the corps if such person has been convicted of a felony or has been adjudicated as delinquent for an offense which, if such person had been tried as an adult, would have been a felony.

Under such rules as are promulgated by the board, the commissioner shall be authorized to enroll persons 14 to 17 years of age as corps members with the following prerequisites:

Enrollment in the corps does not have the effect of encouraging the person to leave school;

If the person is unemancipated, the express written permission from a parent or guardian is obtained; and

Compliance is achieved with applicable federal and state labor laws and education laws.

The maximum age requirement may be waived for corps leaders and specialists with special leadership or occupational skills; such leaders and specialists shall be given special responsibility for providing leadership, character development, and a sense of community responsibility to the corps members, groups, and work crews to which they are assigned.

Special effort shall be made to recruit a broad cross section of the youth of this state who meet selection criteria of the corps. Preference shall be given to youths residing in areas, both urban and rural, in which there exists unemployment substantially exceeding the state average unemployment rate. Members shall be unemployed at the time of enrollment.

Corps members, leaders, and specialists shall be considered state employees solely for the purpose of including such corps members, leaders, and specialists within policies of liability insurance which may be provided to state employees under Code Section 45-9-1. Other provisions of law relating to civil service, hours of work, rate of compensation, sick leave, state retirement plans, and vacation leave do not apply to corps members. Notwithstanding other laws to the contrary, corps members shall not be eligible for unemployment compensation by corps enrollment and service, and employer wage percentage deductions shall not be required as provided under Chapter 8 of Title 34, the "Employment Security Law." Corps members shall be eligible for workers' compensation. This subsection shall not apply to employees of the department.

Initial enrollment in the corps shall be for a period not to exceed one year, which period may be extended for not more than one additional year by mutual agreement of the commissioner and the corps member for the purpose of promoting the member to a position of leader or specialist. Corps members shall be paid at least the minimum wage rate established by federal law. Merit and performance incentive pay raises may be awarded in the discretion of the commissioner.

Corps members shall be selected based on their orientation towards public service, development of job skills and productive work habits, and character development. Special effort shall be made at the time of initial screening to explain rigorous productivity standards and special expectations and obligations of corps membership. An employment agreement shall be entered into by the corps member indicating the member's understanding of and willingness to abide by such standards.

In the development of the corps program, consideration shall be given to providing corps members with a beneficial and meaningful work experience. Standards of productivity, behavior, and punctuality shall be developed and observed. Consideration shall be given to the development of a program that deserves the respect of the public, both in terms of service provided and personal development of corps members.

Education shall be a mandatory but flexible component of the corps program, but classes shall be scheduled after corps working hours. For members participating in primary or secondary education, at least one day or eight hours per week shall be devoted to classroom instruction. Tuition or other fees for postsecondary classes for corps members shall be paid for by the corps. Participation in the education component shall be a primary factor in determining whether the opportunity for extended corps membership shall be offered. Instruction related to the specific role of the department and the various agencies involved in resource conservation shall also be offered either in a classroom setting or as is otherwise appropriate.

The commissioner shall by contract or agreement with the Department of Juvenile Justice and other state agencies serving youth provide for youth served by such department or agencies to participate independently in projects of the Georgia Youth Conservation Corps. When participating independently in projects of the corps, such youth served by the department or other agencies shall be compensated in the same manner and from the same funds as corps members.

(Code 1981, §

12-11-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 922, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 35; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 321, § 2A/HB 493.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "department" was substituted for "division" in two places in subsection (g).

12-11-8. Location of and contracts for projects; prohibited uses of corps members.

Corps projects may take place on any property owned or used by the federal government, by the state or any of its departments, agencies, or political subdivisions, or by nonprofit agencies which otherwise qualify for contracting of services by the corps.

(a.1)
Corps projects may take place on private residential property for purposes of paragraph (8.1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 12-11-4 but only to the extent that federal funds are available for such purposes. No public funds other than federal funds made available to the state shall be expended on such corps projects on private residential property.

The commissioner may, subject to this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board, contract with the federal government, with any department or agency of the state or its political subdivisions, or with nonprofit agencies for projects by the corps or by other corps programs meeting the specifications of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board.

The assignment of corps members shall not result in the displacement of currently employed workers, including partial displacement such as reduction in hours of nonovertime work, wages, or other employment benefits. Agencies that participate in the corps program may not terminate, lay off, or reduce the working hours of any employee for the purpose of using a corps member with available funds. In circumstances where substantial efficiencies or a public purpose may result, agencies may use corps members to carry out essential agency work or contractual functions without displacing current employees.

No corps members may be used in any manner in connection with a work or labor dispute or to impair existing contracts or collective bargaining agreements with existing employees.

(Code 1981, §

12-11-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 922, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 321, § 3/HB 493.)

12-11-9. Grants, donations, bequests; insignia.

The corps may receive grants, donations, bequests, and any other forms of funds or assistance from any sources, public or private.

The corps may employ an insignia or logo of appropriate design identifying specifically the Georgia Youth Conservation Corps. Control of the use of such insignia shall be governed by the commissioner.

(Code 1981, §

12-11-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 922, § 1.)

12-11-10. Coordinated job training and placement services.

Whenever available and appropriate, job training and placement services and education opportunities provided through other federal, state, and local programs such as through the Department of Education, the Department of Labor, the Technical College System of Georgia, and the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia shall be coordinated with projects and programs developed under this chapter to assist eligible corps members. Coordinated services may include, but are not limited to, remedial and postsecondary education, job placement assistance, adult literacy training, job search skills, and job application skills. Whenever possible, eligible corps members without a high school diploma shall receive coordinated services that provide an opportunity to obtain an equivalent high school diploma.

(Code 1981, §

12-11-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 922, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1256, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 335, § 4/SB 435.)

12-11-11. Conservation Corps Advisory Council.

There is created the Conservation Corps Advisory Council, to consist of the following members:

The commissioner of natural resources;

The chairman of the State Board of Education;

The chairman of the State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia;

The Commissioner of Labor;

The Commissioner of Agriculture;

The director of the State Forestry Commission;

The executive director of the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee;

The chairman of the Natural Resources and Environment Committee of the House of Representatives;

The chairman of the Senate Natural Resources and the Environment Committee;

Two members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

Two members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate; and

Two members of the public appointed by the Governor representing the business community.

Members of the council other than members appointed under paragraphs (10), (11), and (12) of subsection (a) of this Code section may designate persons to serve in their place. Members appointed pursuant to paragraph (10) or (11) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall serve for their corresponding two-year term as members of the General Assembly. Members appointed pursuant to paragraph (12) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall serve for terms of two years.

It shall be the duty of the council to:

Meet at such times as necessary in its discretion;

Organize and elect a chairman and such other officers from its membership as it deems necessary;

Advise the board regarding needed rules and regulations for the corps;

Review, analyze, and discuss the operation of the corps;

Advise the department and the director on matters affecting the efficient operation of the corps and the accomplishment of its purposes;

Assist in the promotion of the objectives of the corps; and

Review and recommend appropriate levels of funding and expenditures.

Members of the council shall receive no compensation but for each day of meeting shall receive the same per diem expense amounts and transportation or mileage costs at the legal rate as are granted to members of interim legislative committees.

(Code 1981, §

12-11-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 922, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1256, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 13/HB 117; Ga. L. 2011, p. 632, § 3/HB 49.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, "State Soil and Water Conservation Committee" was substituted for "Georgia Soil and Water Conservation Committee" in paragraph (a)(7).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2009, p. 303,

§

20/HB 117, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act."